apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="žit__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>os</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zír/at__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ati</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>at</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ejme</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ej</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ejte</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>án</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áni</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ánu</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ány</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ána</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áno</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ánas</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ános</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>al</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aliť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ali</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alyť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aly</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alať</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ala</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aloť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alo</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>als</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alas</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>alos</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ámť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>am</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ám</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ámeť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áme</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ášť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áš</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áteť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áte</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>áť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajíť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ají</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajť</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aj</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aje</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajíc</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ajíce</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zel__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ať</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>os</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="zemřel"><i>zemřel</i><par n="zel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="znamenat"><i>znamen</i><par n="zír/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="získávat"><i>získáv</i><par n="zír/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zřízen"><i>zřízen</i><par n="žit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zůstal"><i>zůstal</i><par n="zel__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zůstávat"><i>zůstáv</i><par n="zír/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="žil"><i>žil</i><par n="zel__vblex"/></e>
